Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSFERS FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSES
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding ORS 30.282,  30.285, 278.425, 655.515 and 655.540, the amount
of $10,000,000 is transferred from the Insurance Fund to the General  Fund for general gov-
ernmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding ORS 283.076, the amount  of $50,900,000 is transferred from
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services Operating Fund to  the General Fund for
general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding ORS 276A.209, the amount of $26,500,000 is transferred from
the State Information Technology Operating Fund to  the General Fund for general govern-
mental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 180.095, the  amount of $46,000,000 is transferred from
the Department of  Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account to the General Fund
for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 741.102, the amount of $3,800,000 is transferred from
the Health Insurance Exchange Fund to the General Fund for general governmental pur-
poses. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding ORS 677.290, the amount of $5,000,000 is transferred from
the Oregon Medical Board Account to the General Fund  for general government purposes.
The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding ORS 243.167, the amount  of $15,000,000 is transferred from
the Public Employees’  Revolving Fund to the General Fund for general governmental pur-
poses. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding ORS 274.064, the amount of $3,000,000 is transferred from
the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund to  the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 1
MARIJUANA REVENUE DISTRIBUTION
SECTION 9. Section 3, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is repealed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by sections 1 and 2, chapter 81, Oregon  Laws 2018,
is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number  of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent  of the moneys in the account must be used solely for [ purposes for which
moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services  Account established under ORS 430.380
may be used ] mental health treatment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early inter-
vention and treatment ;
(C) Fifteen percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of  a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 2
(b) A county  that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a  form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each city and
county in this state shall certify with the commission whether the city  or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the  city is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this  section. If a county fails
to comply with this subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers  of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY SERVICES
SECTION 11.  ORS 21.007 is amended to read:
21.007. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that funding be provided to the following
entities by appropriations each biennium to fund programs, services  and activities that were funded
through court fees before the 2011-2013 biennium:
(1) To the counties of this state for the purposes of funding mediation services,  conciliation
services and other services in domestic relations cases.
(2) To  the counties of this state for the purposes of funding the operation of law libraries or of
providing law library services.
(3) To Portland State University and the University of Oregon to fund the programs  and ex-
penses of the Mark O. Hatfield School  of Government and the University of Oregon School of Law
under ORS 36.100 to 36.238 and 183.502.
[(4) To the Housing and Community Services Department for the purpose of funding  programs that
defray the cost of rent for dwelling units for very low income households. ]
[(5)] (4) To the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  to fund clinical legal education
programs at accredited institutions of higher education  that provide civil legal services to victims
of domestic violence, stalking or sexual assault.
[(6)] (5) To the State Department of Agriculture for the purpose of  funding mediation programs
established by the department, other than individual farm credit mediations.
[(7)] (6) To the Judicial Department for the purposes of funding the appellate settlement program
established under ORS 2.560.
[(8)] (7) To the Department of Human Services for the funding of the Office of Children’s Ad-
vocate.
TRUST FOR CULTURAL DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT
SECTION 12. Section 5, chapter 775, Oregon Laws 2009, is repealed.
LEGAL AID ACCOUNT
SECTION 13. ORS 9.577 is repealed.
SECTION 14. (1) The Legal Aid Account established  under ORS 9.577 is abolished on the
effective date of this 2019 Act.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the account  specified in subsection (1) of this section on the
effective date of this 2019 Act shall  be transferred, on the effective date of this 2019 Act, to
the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 3
JUDICIARY
SECTION 15.  ORS 292.406, as amended by section  19, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
292.406. (1)(a) The annual salary of the  Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals shall be [ $147,560]
$154,040 for the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(b) On July 1, [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals, as ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(2)(a) The  annual salary of each other judge of the Court of Appeals shall be [ $144,536] $150,980
for the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(b) On July 1, [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of  each other judge of the Court of Appeals, as
adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 16.  ORS 292.411, as amended by section  20, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
292.411. (1)(a) The annual salary of the Chief  Justice of the Supreme Court shall be [ $150,572]
$157,076 for the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(b) On July 1, [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, as ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court shall be [ $147,560] $154,040
for the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(b) On July 1,  [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court, as ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 17.  ORS 292.416, as amended by section  21, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
292.416. (1) The annual salary of each judge of a circuit court  shall be [ $135,776] $142,136 for
the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(2) On July 1, [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court, as adjusted under
ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 18.  ORS 292.426, as amended by section  22, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
292.426. (1) The annual salary of  the judge of the Oregon Tax Court shall be [ $139,652] $146,048
for the period beginning on January 1, [ 2017] 2019, and ending on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
(2) On July 1, [ 2018] 2020, the annual salary of the judge of the Oregon Tax Court, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
SECTION 18a. ORS 3.012, as amended by section 1, chapter 631,  Oregon Laws 2017, is amended
to read:
3.012. (1) The  judicial districts, the counties constituting the judicial districts and the number
of circuit court judges for each judicial district are as follows:
(a) The first judicial district consists of Jackson County and has [ nine] 10 judges.
(b) The second judicial district consists of Lane County and has 15 judges.
(c) The third judicial district consists of Marion County and has [ 14] 15 judges.
(d) The fourth judicial district consists of Multnomah County and has 38 judges.
(e) The fifth judicial district consists of Clackamas County and has 11 judges.
(f) The sixth judicial district consists of the counties of Morrow and  Umatilla and has five
judges.
(g) The seventh judicial district consists of the counties  of Gilliam, Hood River, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler and has four judges.
(h) The eighth judicial district consists of Baker County and has one judge.
(i) The ninth judicial district consists of Malheur County and has two judges.
(j) The tenth judicial district consists of the counties of Union and Wallowa and has  two judges.
(k) The eleventh judicial district consists of Deschutes County and has seven judges.
(L) The twelfth judicial district consists of Polk County and has three judges.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 4
(m) The thirteenth judicial district consists of Klamath County and has five judges.
(n) The fourteenth judicial district consists of Josephine County and has five judges.
(o) The fifteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Coos and Curry and has six  judges.
(p) The sixteenth judicial district consists of Douglas County and has five judges.
(q) The seventeenth judicial district consists of Lincoln County and has three judges.
(r) The eighteenth judicial district consists of Clatsop County and has three judges.
(s) The nineteenth judicial district consists of Columbia County and has three judges.
(t) The twentieth judicial district consists of Washington County and has 15 judges.
(u) The twenty-first judicial district consists of Benton County and has three judges.
(v) The twenty-second judicial district  consists of the counties of Crook and Jefferson and has
three judges.
(w) The twenty-third judicial district consists of Linn County and has five judges.
(x) The twenty-fourth judicial district consists of  the counties of Grant and Harney and has one
judge.
(y) The twenty-fifth judicial district consists of Yamhill County and has four judges.
(z) The twenty-sixth judicial district consists of Lake County and has one judge.
(aa) The twenty-seventh judicial district consists of Tillamook County and has two judges.
(2) The Secretary of State shall  designate position numbers equal to the number of judges in
each of the judicial  districts established by this section. The positions shall reflect any qualifications
established by ORS 3.041.
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
SECTION 19.
 ORS 171.072, as amended by section 1, chapter 578,  Oregon Laws 2013, and sec-
tion 17, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
171.072. (1) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive for services an annual salary
that equals [ the greater of: ]
[(a)] one step below the maximum step of Salary Range 1 in the Management Service Compen-
sation Plan in the executive department as defined in ORS 174.112[ ; or ]
[(b) Seventeen percent of the salary of a circuit court judge ].
(2) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of  Representatives each shall re-
ceive for services,  as additional salary, an amount equal to the salary allowed each of them as a
member under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive, as an allowance for expenses  not oth-
erwise provided for, a per diem determined as provided in subsection (9) of this section for each  day
within the period that the Legislative Assembly is in session, to be paid with the  salary provided
for in subsection (1) of this section. Pursuant to procedures determined by the  Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, a member may draw from an accrued allowance.
(4) A member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive, as  an allowance for expenses incurred
in the performance of  official duties during periods when the legislature is not in session, $400 for
each calendar month or part of a calendar  month during those periods, to be paid monthly, and
subject to approval of the President  of the Senate or Speaker of the House of Representatives,
mileage expenses and a per diem determined as  provided in subsection (9) of this section for each
day a member is engaged in the  business of legislative interim and statutory committees, including
advisory committees and  subcommittees of advisory committees, and task forces and for each day
a member serves on interstate bodies, advisory committees and other entities on which  the member
serves ex officio, whether or not the entity is a legislative one.
(5) In addition  to the mileage and per diem expense payments provided by this section, a member
of the Legislative  Assembly may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses, subject
to approval by the President of the Senate or Speaker of  the House of Representatives, for legisla-
tive business outside of the state.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 5
(6) The President of the  Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may delegate
to the chairpersons of interim and statutory committees and task forces the  approval authority
granted to the President and the Speaker by subsection (4) of  this section, with respect to expenses
incurred in attending any meeting of a particular committee or task force.
(7) Amounts  received under subsections (3) to (5) of this section are excluded from gross income
and expenditures of the amounts  are excluded in computing deductions for purposes of ORS chapter
316. If there is attached  to the personal income return a schedule of all ordinary and necessary
business expenses paid during  the tax year as a member of the Legislative Assembly, a deduction
may be claimed on the return for legislative expenses paid in excess of  the amounts received under
subsections (3) to (5) of this section. Expenses of members of  the Legislative Assembly who are re-
imbursed by the state for actual expenses for  meals and lodging associated with state travel for the
same period during which a legislator receives per diem are subject to state income tax.
(8) For periods when  the Legislative Assembly is not in session, [ the Legislative Administration
Committee shall provide for a telephone and ] a member of the Legislative Assembly shall receive
an expense allowance [ for members of the Legislative Assembly ] that is in  addition to the amount
allowed under subsection (4) of this section. [ In determining the amount of allowance  for members,
the committee shall consider the geographic area of the member’s district. The additional allowance
shall] The amount allocated to a member under this subsection  must be adjusted based on
the geographic area of the member’s district to  reflect travel  expenses necessary to communi-
cate in [ districts of varying sizes ] the district .
(9) The per diem allowance referred to in subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be the
amount fixed for per diem allowance that is  authorized by the United States Internal Revenue Ser-
vice to be excluded from gross income without itemization.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 291.278 is amended to read:
291.278. (1) Upon completion of the determination by  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services under ORS 291.274 and 291.276, the department shall:
(a) Transfer to the Legislative Fiscal Office Operating  Fund, with appropriate notice to the
State Treasurer,  out of moneys appropriated to each state agency, the amount of [ $4 million ]
$4,500,000; and
(b) After deducting the amounts  specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, transfer to the
General Fund, with appropriate notice to the State Treasurer, out of moneys appropriated  to each
state agency, the amount of governmental service expenses certified for the agency.
(2) In the case of a state agency that collects or receives moneys for fees, fines, licenses or taxes
not by law made  a part of the General Fund available for general governmental purposes, if moneys
available to such state agency are not sufficient to permit the transfers  under subsection (1) of this
section, the department  shall notify the state agency of the amount certified with respect to the
state agency under ORS 291.274 and  291.276, less any amount transferred out of moneys appropri-
ated to such state agency under subsection  (1) of this section. Thereafter, until such balance has
been paid  into the General Fund, 10 percent of all moneys collected or received by the state agency
for fees, fines, licenses or taxes not by law made a part of the General Fund available for general
governmental purposes shall be:
(a) Transferred  by the department to and made a part of the General Fund available for general
governmental purposes if such moneys are paid to the State Treasurer by the state agency; or
(b) Paid  to the State Treasurer by the state agency receiving such moneys at the time when they
are received by the state agency if such moneys are authorized by  law to be kept and disbursed
other than by  and through the State Treasurer, and be credited by the State Treasurer to and made
a part of the General Fund available for general governmental purposes.
(3) The transfers and payments  to the Legislative Fiscal Office Operating Fund and the General
Fund required by this section shall be made notwithstanding any law that  appropriates such moneys
or any of them to any other purposes, and such portion so paid  and transferred is not subject to any
special uses thereby provided.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 6
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 21. The University Innovation Research Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the University
Innovation Research Fund must be credited to the fund. The fund consists of  all moneys
appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or
otherwise and any donations or grants  received for the purpose of the fund. Moneys in the
fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Business Development Department to
make grants to public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 or grants to the Oregon Health and
Science University for the purpose of matching competitive federal research grant awards.
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SECTION 22.
 ORS 180.160 is amended to read:
180.160. (1) Subject to rules prescribed by the Attorney General, in rendering assistance  to the
respective officers, departments, boards and commissions of state government, and other public
bodies, the Department of Justice may charge such  officers, agencies and public bodies (including,
when appropriate, the Department of Justice itself) separately for the cost of such assistance,  said
cost including, but not limited to salaries of assistants and administrative and clerical salaries, in-
vestigative services, and capital outlay; and shall  also charge such officers, departments, boards,
commissions or public bodies  for other costs incurred and disbursements made pursuant to request
or authorization in  connection with such assistance, and not paid directly out of moneys appropri-
ated or otherwise available for expenditure by such officers, agencies or public bodies.
(2) The Department of Justice may  not impose charges under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion at rates greater than the rates established for the biennium through the  legislative
budgeting process in the  preceding odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative
Assembly unless the department first notifies the Joint Committee on Ways and  Means, the
Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means or the Emergency Board.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 180.095 is amended to read:
180.095. (1) The Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account is  created
in the General Fund.  All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department
of Justice and may be used to pay for only the following activities:
(a) Restitution and refunds in proceedings described in paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(b) Consumer and business education relating to the laws governing antitrust,  unlawful trade
practices and the environment; and
(c) Personal services, travel, meals,  lodging and all other costs and expenses incurred by the
department in  investigating, preparing, commencing and prosecuting the following actions and suits,
and enforcing judgments, settlements, compromises and assurances of voluntary compliance  arising
out of the following actions and suits:
(A) Actions and suits under the state and federal antitrust laws;
(B) Actions and suits under ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.656;
(C) Criminal prosecutions under state and federal environmental laws;
(D) Actions commenced under ORS 59.331; and
(E) Actions and suits under ORS 180.750 to 180.785.
(2) Moneys in the Department of Justice Protection and Education  Revolving Account are not
subject to allotment. Upon request of the Attorney General, the State Treasurer shall create sub-
accounts within the account for the purposes of managing moneys in  the account and allocating
those moneys to the activities described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, all sums of money received by the Department of Jus-
tice under a judgment, settlement, compromise or assurance of voluntary compliance,  including
damages, restitution, refunds, attorney fees, costs,  disbursements and other recoveries, but excluding
civil penalties under ORS 646.642, in proceedings described in subsection  (1)(c) of this section shall,
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 7
upon receipt, be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Department of Justice  Pro-
tection and Education Revolving Account. However, if the action  or suit was based on an expendi-
ture or loss from a public body or a dedicated fund, the amount of  such expenditure or loss, after
deduction of attorney fees and expenses awarded to the department by  the court or agreed to by the
parties, if any, shall be  credited to the public body or dedicated fund and the remainder thereof
credited to the Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account.
(4) If the Department of Justice recovers restitution  or refunds in a proceeding described in
subsection (1)(c) of this section, and the  department cannot determine the persons to whom the
restitution or refunds should be paid or  the amount of the restitution or refund payable to individual
claimants is de minimis, the restitution or refunds may not be deposited in the Department of Justice
Protection and Education Revolving Account and shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(5) Before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Justice shall report to the Joint
Committee on Ways and Means:
(a) The department’s projection of the balance in the Department of Justice Protection  and Ed-
ucation Revolving Account at the end of the biennium in which the report is made  and at the end
of the following biennium;
(b) The amount of the balance held for restitution and refunds; and
(c) An estimate of the department’s anticipated costs and expenses under  subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section for the biennium in which the report is made and for the following biennium.
(d) Any judgment, settlement, compromise or  other recovery, the proceeds of which are
used for purposes other than:
(A) For deposit into the Department of Justice Protection and  Education Revolving Ac-
count; or
(B) For payment  of legal costs related to the judgment, settlement, compromise or other
recovery.
(6) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means, after consideration  of recommendations made by
the Department of Justice, shall use the  information reported under subsection (5) of this section to
determine an appropriate balance for the revolving account.
TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding ORS 184.751, the Department of Transportation shall
transfer the amount of $10,100,000 from  the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund
established under ORS 184.751 to the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation  Fund es-
tablished under ORS 391.800, to be used  for the purposes of distribution to transit entities
to support elderly and disabled transit services. The transfer shall be made on July 1, 2019.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 25. The unit captions  used in this 2019 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 26. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 8
Passed by House June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2377 (HB 2377-B) Page 9